Maryland, session 2025, HB0610.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0610*

HOUSE BILL 610
Article – Criminal Procedure
10–110.
(a) A person may file a petition listing relevant facts for expungement of a police
record, court record, or other record maintained by the State or a political subdivision of
the State if the person is convicted of:
(1) a misdemeanor that is a violation of:
(i) § 6–320 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article;
(ii) an offense listed in § 17–613(a) of the Business Occupations and
Professions Article;
(iii) § 5–712, § 19–304, § 19–308, or Title 5, Subtitle 6 or Subtitle 9 of
the Business Regulation Article;
(iv) § 3–1508 or § 10–402 of the Courts Article;
(v) § 14–1915, § 14–2902, or § 14–2903 of the Commercial Law
Article;
(vi) § 5–211 of this article;
(vii) § 3–203 or § 3–808 of the Criminal Law Article;
(viii) § 5–601 not involving the use or possession of cannabis, §
5–602(b)(1), § 5–618, § 5–619, § 5–620, § 5–703, § 5–708, or § 5–902 of the Criminal Law
Article;
(ix) § 6–105, § 6–108, § 6–205 (fourth degree burglary), § 6–206, §
6–301, § 6–303, § 6–306, § 6–307, § 6–402, or § 6–503 of the Criminal Law Article;
(x) § 7–104, § 7–203, § 7–205, § 7–304, § 7–308, or § 7–309 of the
Criminal Law Article;
(xi) § 8–103, § 8–206, § 8–401, § 8–402, § 8–404, § 8–406, § 8–408, §
8–503, § 8–521, § 8–523, or § 8–904 of the Criminal Law Article;
(xii) § 9–204, § 9–205, § 9–503, or § 9–506 of the Criminal Law Article;
(xiii) § 10–110, § 10–201, § 10–402, § 10–404, or § 10–502 of the
Criminal Law Article;
(xiv) § 11–303, § 11–306, or § 11–307 of the Criminal Law Article;

HOUSE BILL 610 3
(xv) § 12–102, § 12–103, § 12–104, § 12–105, § 12–109, § 12–203, §
12–204, § 12–205, or § 12–302 of the Criminal Law Article;
(xvi) § 13–401, § 13–602, or § 16–201 of the Election Law Article;
(xvii) § 4–509 of the Family Law Article;
(xviii) § 18–215 of the Health – General Article;
(xix) § 4–411 or § 4–2005 of the Housing and Community Development
Article;
(xx) § 27–403, § 27–404, § 27–405, § 27–406, § 27–406.1, § 27–407, §
27–407.1, or § 27–407.2 of the Insurance Article;
(xxi) § 8–725.4, § 8–725.5, § 8–725.6, § 8–725.7, § 8–726, § 8–726.1, §
8–727.1, or § 8–738.2 of the Natural Resources Article or any prohibited act related to speed
limits for personal watercraft;
(xxii) § 10–301, § 10–306, § 10–308.1, § 10–413(e)(1), § 10–418, §
10–502, § 10–611, or § 10–907(a) of the Natural Resources Article;
(xxiii) § 5–307, § 5–308, § 6–602, § 7–402, or § 14–114 of the Public
Safety Article;
(xxiv) § 7–318.1, § 7–509, or § 10–507 of the Real Property Article;
(xxv) § 9–124 of the State Government Article;
(xxvi) § 13–1001, § 13–1004, § 13–1007, or § 13–1024 of the
Tax – General Article;
(xxvii) § 16–303 of the Transportation Article; or
(xxviii) the common law offenses of affray, rioting, criminal
contempt, battery, or hindering;
(2) a felony that is a violation of:
(i) § 7–104 of the Criminal Law Article;
(ii) the prohibition against possession with intent to distribute a
controlled dangerous substance under § 5–602 of the Criminal Law Article; or
(iii) § 6–202(a), § 6–203, or § 6–204 of the Criminal Law Article; or

HOUSE BILL 610
(3) an attempt, a conspiracy, or a solicitation of any offense listed in item
(1) or (2) of this subsection.
(J) A CHARGE MAY BE EXPUNGED UNDER THIS SECTION IF THE CHARGE
WAS NOT DISPOSED OF BY AN UNEQUIVOCAL CONVICTION, BUT WAS INSTEAD:
(1) DISPOSED OF BY THE COURT WITH A NO FINDING DESIGNATION;
OR
(2) INCLUDED IN A CASE THAT WAS DESIGNATED BY THE COURT AS
HAVING BEEN TERMINATED WITHOUT FINDING.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.